Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-511.02
Service on
dissolved corporation.

A dissolved corporation
may be served by personal, residence, certified
mail, or designated delivery service
upon any appointed receiver. If there is no receiver, a dissolved corporation
may be served by personal, residence, certified
mail, or designated delivery service
upon any person who at the time of dissolution was an officer, director, managing
agent, or registered agent, or upon any officer or director designated in
the last annual report filed with the Secretary of State.

Laws 1983, LB 447, § 28;

Laws 2011, LB669, § 13.